Utah statutes.
78B-14-317.   Communications between tribunals.
A tribunal of this state may communicate with a tribunal of another state or
foreign country or political subdivision in a record, or by telephone or other
means, to obtain information concerning the laws, the legal effect of a
judgment, decree, or order of that tribunal, and the status of a proceeding in
the other state or a foreign country or political subdivision.  A tribunal of
this state may furnish similar information by similar means to a tribunal of
another state or foreign country or political subdivision.
